Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 1. Licensing.

Sec. 06.50.010.
License required.

A person, including a person doing business from outside this state, may not engage in the business of making or offering to make deferred deposit advances in this state without having a license under this chapter. A separate license is required for each physical location or Internet website from which the person conducts the business.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Sec. 06.50.020.
Qualifications for license.

To qualify for a license, an applicant shall

have cash assets of at least $25,000, as determined under generally accepted accounting principles, except that an applicant who wants to engage in the business of making advances at more than one location in the state shall have cash assets of at least $25,000 for each location;

demonstrate the financial responsibility, financial condition, business experience, character, and general fitness that reasonably warrant the department’s belief that the applicant’s business will be conducted lawfully and fairly; when determining whether this qualification has been met, and for the purpose of investigating compliance with this chapter, the department may review

the relevant business records of the applicant and the adequacy of the capital of the applicant;

the competence, experience, integrity, and financial ability of the applicant, and, if the applicant is an entity, of any person who is a member, partner, director, senior officer, or owner of 10 percent or more of the equity of the applicant; and

a record, on the part of the applicant or a person described in (B) of this paragraph, of

a conviction for criminal activity, fraud, or other act of personal dishonesty;

an act, an omission, or a practice that constitutes a breach of a fiduciary duty; or

a suspension, a revocation, a removal, or an administrative act by an agency or a department of the United States or a state limiting the applicant’s or person’s participation in the conduct of a business;

if the person has a physical business location in the state, have a physical business location that is accessible by and convenient to the public;

have a current business license issued under AS 43.70; and

if applicable, have a certificate of incorporation under AS

10.06.218

, have a certificate of authority under AS

10.06.705

, have a copy of articles of organization that satisfies AS

10.50.090

, be registered under AS

10.50.605

, have a statement of foreign qualification filed under AS

32.06.922

, have a certificate of limited partnership filed under AS

32.11.060

, or be registered under AS

32.11.420

.

The requirements in (a) of this section are continuing in nature and may be reviewed periodically by the department.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 56 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For deferred deposit advances, see 3 AAC 11.

Sec. 06.50.030.
Application.

An application for a license must be in writing and under oath, in a form prescribed by the department by regulation, and include at least

the legal name, residence, and business address of the applicant and, if the applicant is not a natural person, of each member, partner, director, senior officer, or owner of 10 percent or more of the equity of the applicant;

the address and physical location of the principal place of business named in the application; and

other information the department may require with respect to the applicant and, if the applicant is not a natural person, about the applicant’s members, partners, directors, senior officers, or owners of 10 percent or more of the equity of the applicant.

The applicant shall submit with the application the bond required by AS

06.50.040

and a nonrefundable application fee in an amount that is established by the department by regulation and that does not exceed $3,000. The application fee for the initial license may not be prorated.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For deferred deposit advances, see 3 AAC 11.

Sec. 06.50.040.
Bond.

An applicant for a license shall file with the application a bond

in a form to be approved by the department;

in which the applicant is the obligor; and

in the sum of $25,000 for a business with one location and $50,000 for a business with more than one location.

Only one bond is required for an application for a business with more than one location.

The bond required by (a) of this section is for the use of the state and a person who may have a cause of action against the obligor under this chapter.

The bond must state that the obligor will

faithfully conform to and abide by the provisions of this chapter and regulations adopted by the department under this chapter; and

pay to the state and to a person all money that may become due or owing to the state or to the person from the applicant under this chapter.

The bond must remain in effect for three years following the denial of a renewal of a license or the expiration of a license.

If, at any time, the department finds that a bond filed under (a) of this section is unsatisfactory for any reason, the department may require the licensee to file, within 10 days after the receipt of a written demand, an additional bond to comply with this section.

The licensee shall file a new bond that complies with this section each time a license is renewed.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Sec. 06.50.050.
Investigation by department.

Within 60 days after an applicant files a completed application, the bond, and an application fee, the department shall investigate whether the applicant satisfies the qualifications of AS

06.50.020(a)

. If the department finds that the applicant satisfies the qualifications, it shall approve the application and issue the applicant a license to engage in the business of making deferred deposit advances.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Sec. 06.50.060.
Conditions precedent to license.

The requirements of AS

06.50.030

—

06.50.050

are conditions precedent to the issuance of a license under this chapter. The license permits the applicant to make advances under this chapter at the location specified in the application.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Sec. 06.50.070.
Duration of license.

A license issued under this chapter is valid for two calendar years. Each license remains in force through the calendar year after the calendar year in which the license was issued unless surrendered, suspended, or revoked under this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For deferred deposit advances, see 3 AAC 11.

Sec. 06.50.080.
Renewal of license.

A license issued under this chapter shall be renewed on or before the date set by the department by submitting to the department a completed renewal application on a form established by the department and paying a nonrefundable renewal fee established by the department, which may not exceed $3,000.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For deferred deposit advances, see 3 AAC 11.

Sec. 06.50.090.
Denial of license or renewal.

If the department determines that an applicant is not qualified to receive a license or a license renewal, the department shall notify the applicant in writing within 20 days that the application has been denied and state the basis for the denial.

The decision of the department to deny an application or a renewal may be reviewed in the manner provided in AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

(Administrative Procedure Act).

If the denial of a renewal is upheld, the former licensee shall return the license to the department within 10 days after the former licensee receives notice of the denial.

A license application shall be considered withdrawn within the meaning of this section if the applicant fails to respond to a written notification of a deficiency in the application within 60 days after the date of the notification.

If a license renewal is denied or if a license is surrendered, suspended, or revoked, all accounts of the licensee remain subject to this chapter until paid in full.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)